Alaska statutes. Title 45. Trade and Commerce.
Article 8. Alaska Uniform Trade Secrets Act.

Sec. 45.50.910.
Injunctive relief for misappropriation of trade secrets.

A court may enjoin actual or threatened misappropriation of trade secrets. Upon application to the court, an injunction shall be terminated when the trade secret has ceased to exist, but the injunction may be continued for an additional reasonable period of time in order to eliminate commercial advantage that otherwise would be derived from the misappropriation.

If the court determines that it would be unreasonable to prohibit future use of a trade secret, an injunction may condition future use upon payment of a reasonable royalty for no longer than the period of time the use could have been prohibited.

In appropriate circumstances, affirmative acts to protect a trade secret may be compelled by court order.

History.

(§ 1 ch 103 SLA 1988)

Sec. 45.50.915.
Damages.

In addition to or in lieu of injunctive relief, a complainant may recover damages for the actual loss caused by misappropriation. A complainant also may recover for the unjust enrichment caused by misappropriation that is not taken into account in computing damages for actual loss.

If wilful and malicious misappropriation exists, the court may award exemplary damages in an amount not exceeding twice the damages awarded under (a) of this section.

History.

(§ 1 ch 103 SLA 1988)

Sec. 45.50.920.
Preservation of secrecy.

In an action under AS

45.50.910

—

45.50.945

, a court shall preserve the secrecy of an alleged trade secret by reasonable means, which may include granting protective orders in connection with discovery proceedings, holding in-camera hearings, sealing the records of the action, and ordering any person involved in the litigation not to disclose an alleged trade secret without prior court approval.

History.

(§ 1 ch 103 SLA 1988)

Sec. 45.50.925.
Limitation of actions.

An action for misappropriation must be brought within three years after the misappropriation is discovered or by the exercise of reasonable diligence should have been discovered. For the purposes of this section, a continuing misappropriation constitutes a single claim.

History.

(§ 1 ch 103 SLA 1988)

Sec. 45.50.930.
Effect on other laws.

AS

45.50.910

—

45.50.945

displace conflicting tort, restitutionary, and other state laws pertaining to civil liability for misappropriation of a trade secret.

AS

45.50.910

—

45.50.945

do not affect

contractual or other civil liability or relief that is not based upon misappropriation of a trade secret; or

criminal liability for misappropriation of a trade secret.

AS

45.50.910

—

45.50.945

do not apply to investigations or actions by the attorney general under AS

45.50.471

—

45.50.561

(Alaska Unfair Trade Practices and Consumer Protection Act) or under AS

45.50.562

—

45.50.596

(Alaska Restraint of Trade Act).

History.

(§ 1 ch 103 SLA 1988; am § 46 ch 3 SLA 2017)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2017 amendment, effective July 1, 2017, in (c), substituted “(Alaska Unfair Trade Practices and Consumer Protection Act)” for “unfair trade practices and consumer protection” following “AS

45.50.471

—

45.50.561

” and “(Alaska Restraint of Trade Act)” for “(restraint of trade)” following “AS

45.50.562

—

45.50.596

”.

Sec. 45.50.935.
Uniformity of application and construction.

AS

45.50.910

—

45.50.945

shall be applied and construed to make the law uniform with respect to trade secrets among states enacting similar provisions.

History.

(§ 1 ch 103 SLA 1988)

Sec. 45.50.940.
Definitions.

In AS

45.50.910

—

45.50.945

, unless the context otherwise requires,

“improper means” includes theft, bribery, misrepresentation, breach or inducement of a breach of a duty to maintain secrecy, or espionage through electronic or other means;

“misappropriation” means

acquisition of a trade secret of another by a person who knows or has reason to know that the trade secret was acquired by improper means; or

disclosure or use of a trade secret of another without express or implied consent by a person who

used improper means to acquire knowledge of the trade secret; or

at the time of disclosure or use, knew or had reason to know that knowledge of the trade secret was derived from or through a person who had utilized improper means to acquire it or who owed a duty to the person seeking relief to maintain its secrecy or limit its use, or was acquired under circumstances giving rise to a duty to maintain its secrecy or limit its use; or

before a material change of the person’s position, knew or had reason to know that it was a trade secret and that knowledge of it had been acquired by accident or mistake;

“trade secret” means information that

derives independent economic value, actual or potential, from not being generally known to, and not being readily ascertainable by proper means by, other persons who can obtain economic value from its disclosure or use; and

is the subject of efforts that are reasonable under the circumstances to maintain its secrecy.

History.

(§ 1 ch 103 SLA 1988)

Sec. 45.50.945.
Short title.

AS

45.50.910

—

45.50.945

may be cited as the Alaska Uniform Trade Secrets Act.

History.

(§ 1 ch 103 SLA 1988)